Washington statutes.
RCW 15.80.500

Weigher's license—Issuance—Expiration date.

Upon the director's satisfaction that the applicant is of good moral character, has the ability to weigh accurately and make correct certified weight tickets and that he or she is an employee or agent of the weighmaster, the director shall issue a weigher's license which will expire annually on a date set by rule by the director. License fees shall be prorated where necessary to accommodate staggering of expiration dates of a license or licenses.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6106; 1991 c 109 s 9; 1969 ex.s. c 100 s 21.]